New York, session 2025-2026, A9185.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 240.50 of the penal law, as amended by chapter 276 2 of the laws of 1973, the opening paragraph and subdivision 4 as amended 3 by section 1 of part G of chapter 501 of the laws of 2012, subdivisions 4 1 and 2 as amended by chapter 146 of the laws of 1979, subdivision 3 as 5 amended by chapter 302 of the laws of 2001, and the closing paragraph as 6 amended by chapter 301 of the laws of 2001, is amended to read as 7 follows: 8 § 240.50 Falsely reporting an incident in the third degree. 9 A person is guilty of falsely reporting an incident in the third 10 degree when, knowing the information reported, conveyed or circulated to 11 be false or baseless, [he or she] such person: 12 1. Initiates or circulates a false report or warning, including using 13 artificial intelligence or generative artificial intelligence as defined 14 by section seventeen hundred of the general business law, of an alleged 15 occurrence or impending occurrence of a crime, catastrophe or emergency 16 under circumstances in which it is not unlikely that public alarm or 17 inconvenience will result; or 18 2. Reports, by word or action including using artificial intelligence 19 or generative artificial intelligence as defined by section seventeen 20 hundred of the general business law, to an official or quasi-official 21 agency or organization having the function of dealing with emergencies 22 involving danger to life or property, an alleged occurrence or impending 23 occurrence of a catastrophe or emergency which did not in fact occur or 24 does not in fact exist; or EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13942-01-5 A. 9185 2 1 3. Gratuitously reports to a law enforcement officer or agency, 2 including using artificial intelligence or generative artificial intel- 3 ligence as defined by section seventeen hundred of the general business 4 law, (a) the alleged occurrence of an offense or incident which did not 5 in fact occur; or (b) an allegedly impending occurrence of an offense or 6 incident which in fact is not about to occur; or (c) false information 7 relating to an actual offense or incident or to the alleged implication 8 of some person therein; or 9 4. Reports, by word or action including using artificial intelligence 10 or generative artificial intelligence as defined by section seventeen 11 hundred of the general business law, an alleged occurrence or condition 12 of child abuse or maltreatment or abuse or neglect of a vulnerable 13 person which did not in fact occur or exist to: 14 (a) the statewide central register of child abuse and maltreatment, as 15 defined in title six of article six of the social services law or the 16 vulnerable persons' central register as defined in article eleven of 17 such law, or 18 (b) any person required to report cases of suspected child abuse or 19 maltreatment pursuant to subdivision one of section four hundred thir- 20 teen of the social services law or to report cases of suspected abuse or 21 neglect of a vulnerable person pursuant to section four hundred ninety- 22 one of such law, knowing that the person is required to report such 23 cases, and with the intent that such an alleged occurrence be reported 24 to the statewide central register or vulnerable persons' central regis- 25 ter. 26 Falsely reporting an incident in the third degree is a class A misde- 27 meanor. 28 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.